Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325G.221] VICTIM PAYMENT SUSPENSION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Victim payment suspension. new text end new text begin (a) A seller or lender must suspend a victim's recurring billing requirement when a cell phone, vehicle, or other property associated with the bill has been seized as a result of the crime. new text end new text begin (b) The victim must provide to the seller or lender documentation that was provided to the victim by law enforcement to verify the property was seized as evidence and is in the custody of law enforcement. new text end new text begin (c) A seller or lender must only resume a recurring bill requirement when the seized property has been returned to the victim. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Reporting failure to pay. new text end new text begin A seller or lender must not report to a collection agency, as defined under section 332.31, subdivision 3, that a victim has failed to make payments on property for the duration of time that the property is seized by law enforcement. new text end